Maine, session 132, LD1419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§40, ¶B, as amended by PL 2005, c. 618, §3, is
further amended to read:
B. New manufactured housing to the extent of all costs, other than materials, included
in the sale price, but the exemption may not exceed 50% 75% of the sale price.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to sales of manufactured housing occurring on
or after January 1, 2026.